Arkansas, session 2025, SB261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-21-102, concerning the definitions to be
used in relation to all-terrain vehicles, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(5)(A) "Unpaved road" means a public street or highway that is
not paved with asphalt, chip-seal, concrete, brick, or stone.
(B) "Unpaved road" includes without limitation a road
constructed of:
(i) Dirt; or
(ii) Gravel.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 27-21-106(a)(1), concerning the operation
of all-terrain vehicles on public streets and highways, is amended to read as
follows:
*ZRC038*
03-10-2025 10:28:22 ZRC038

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB261
(1) A person may operate an all-terrain vehicle on a public
street or highway if the all-terrain vehicle is:
(A) Both:
(i) Used in farming or hunting operations; and
(B)(ii) Operated on a public street or highway in
order to get from one field to another; or
(B) Operated:
(i) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this
section, on a public street or highway that is unpaved; and
(ii) By a person who:
(a) Is a:
(1) Resident of this state who has a
valid commercial driver license or noncommercial driver's license issued by
this state in his or her immediate possession as required under § 27-16-601;
or
(2) Nonresident who is subject to the
exemption from the licensing requirements of this state under § 27-16-603(3)
or (4); and
(b) Maintains liability insurance on the all-
terrain vehicle that provides at a minimum the following coverage:
(i) Not less than twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000) for bodily injury or death of one (1) person in any one (1)
accident; and
(ii) If the accident results in damage
to or destruction of property, not less than twenty-five thousand dollars
($25,000) for the damage to or destruction of property of others in any one
(1) accident.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 27-21-106(a)(3)(A), concerning the
operation of an all-terrain vehicle on public streets and highways, is
amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) A person who has lost one (1) or both legs above the
ankle or who otherwise has a serious walking disability is permitted to
operate a three-wheeled, four-wheeled, or six-wheeled all-terrain vehicle as
a means of transportation on any of the following:
(i) A nonhard-surfaced An unpaved road;
03-10-2025 10:28:22 ZRC038

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB261
(ii) The shoulder of a state or federal highway,
except as provided under subdivision (a)(3)(E) of this section; or
(iii) A public street or road when traveling on the
public street or road is the most reasonable route of access available to him
or her from one off-road trail to another off-road trail or from his or her
private property to an off-road trail.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 27-21-106, concerning the operation
of an all-terrain vehicle on public streets and highways, is amended to add
an additional subsection to read as follows:
(c) The quorum court of a county may adopt an ordinance to prohibit
the operation of an all-terrain vehicle under subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this
section on unpaved roads located in the county by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of
the total membership of the quorum court.

/s/A. Clark




















03-10-2025 10:28:22 ZRC038